Ohio, session 136, HB275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.444 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.444. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number fifty-three between township road number eleven to county road number five, in Wyandot county, shall be known as the "Deputy Sheriff Daniel Kin Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.